Missouri, session 2026, HB1795.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 324, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 324.1720, to read as follows:
324.1720. 1. As used in this section, the term "political subdivision" means any
county, township, city, incorporated town, or village in this state.
2. The general assembly hereby occupies and preempts the entire field of
legislation concerning the practice of licensed professions regulated under chapters 330,
331, 332, 334, 335, 336, 337, 338, and 340. A political subdivision is preempted from
enacting, maintaining, or enforcing any order, ordinance, rule, regulation, policy, or
other similar measure that prohibits, restricts, limits, regulates, controls, directs, or
interferes with the practice of such licensed professions.
3. Nothing in this section shall preclude or preempt a political subdivision from
exercising its lawful authority to regulate zoning or land use, to enforce a building or
fire code regulation, to impose a tax or license fee for the privilege of carrying on a
profession described in subsection 2 of this section consistent with the laws regulating
such taxes or license fees, or to otherwise regulate for the general health, safety,
sanitation, and welfare as long as the order, ordinance, rule, regulation, policy, or other
measure does not interfere with, restrict, or limit the ability of a lawfully licensed
professional to engage in any act or perform any procedure that falls within the
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 1795 2
professionally recognized scope of practice of the licensed professional in the practice of
a profession described in subsection 2 of this section.
✔